Utah statutes.
63G-7-701.   Payment of claim or judgment against state -- Presentment for payment.

(1)  Each claim, as defined by Subsection 63G-7-102(1), that is approved by the state or any final judgment obtained against the state shall be presented for payment to:

(a)  the state risk manager; or

(b)  the office, agency, institution, or other instrumentality involved, if payment by that instrumentality is otherwise permitted by law.

(2)  If payment of the claim is not authorized by law, the judgment or claim shall be presented to the board of examiners for action as provided in Section 63G-9-301.

(3)  If a judgment against the state is reduced by the operation of Section 63G-7-604, the claimant may submit the excess claim to the board of examiners.



Amended by Chapter 278, 2013 General Session

